Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202637-456
Limited antelope, elk, or mountain lion permit; issuance; limitation.

The issuance of limited antelope permits pursuant to section 37-455 in any management unit shall not exceed seventy-five percent of the regular permits authorized for such antelope management unit. The issuance of limited elk permits pursuant to section 37-455 in any management unit shall not exceed seventy-five percent of the regular permits authorized for such elk management unit. The issuance of limited mountain lion permits pursuant to section 37-455 in any management unit shall not exceed seventy-five percent of the regular permits authorized for such mountain lion management unit.

Laws 1974, LB 865, § 2;

Laws 1975, LB 270, § 2;

Laws 1985, LB 557, § 7;

Laws 1996, LB 584, § 8;

R.S.Supp.,1996, § 37-215.08;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 166;

Laws 2009, LB105, § 21;

Laws 2021, LB507, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB979, § 15.
July 18, 2026